Florida, session 2026, HB815.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) and paragraph (a) of subsection
(6) of section 627.7011, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
627.7011 Homeowners' policies; property insurance
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb815-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 815 2026
policies; offer of replacement cost coverage and law and
ordinance coverage.—
(5)(a) As used in this subsection, the term "authorized
inspector" means an inspector who is approved by the insurer and
who is:
1. A home inspector licensed under s. 468.8314;
2. A building code inspector certified under s. 468.607;
3. A general, building, or residential contractor licensed
under s. 489.111 or a roofing contractor;
4. A professional engineer licensed under s. 471.015;
5. A professional architect licensed under s. 481.213; or
6. A Registered Roof Consultant certified by the
International Institute of Building Enclosure Consultants;
7. A Registered Roof Observer certified by the
International Institute of Building Enclosure Consultants; or
8.6. Any other individual or entity recognized by the
insurer as possessing the necessary qualifications to properly
complete a general inspection of a residential structure insured
with a homeowner's insurance policy.
(b) An insurer may not refuse to issue or refuse to renew
a property insurance homeowner's policy insuring a residential
structure with a roof that is less than 15 years old solely
because of the age of the roof.
(c)1. For a roof that is at least 15 years old, an insurer
must differentiate between a low-slope roof with a 2-inch pitch
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb815-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 815 2026
or less and a steep-slope roof with a pitch of more than 2
inches in its offer for coverage under a policy.
2. Before requiring the replacement of a steep-slope roof
as a condition of issuing or renewing a property insurance
policy, the insurer must allow a property owner homeowner to
have a roof inspection performed by an authorized inspector at
the property owner's homeowner's expense before requiring the
replacement of the roof of a residential structure as a
condition of issuing or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy.
3. If the roof is a steep-slope roof, the insurer may not
refuse to issue or refuse to renew a property homeowner's
insurance policy solely because of roof age if an inspection of
the roof of the residential structure performed by an authorized
inspector indicates that the roof has 5 years or more of useful
life remaining.
4. If the roof is a low-slope roof, the insurer may not
refuse to issue or refuse to renew a property insurance policy
solely because of roof age if an authorized inspector determines
that the roof may be restored by having a roof coating system
applied which will result in the roof having 5 years or more of
useful life remaining.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, a roof's age shall be
calculated using the last date on which 100 percent of the
roof's surface area was built or replaced in accordance with the
building code in effect at that time or the initial date of a
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb815-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 815 2026
partial roof replacement when subsequent partial roof builds or
replacements were completed that resulted in 100 percent of the
roof's surface area being built or replaced.
(e) This subsection applies to property homeowners'
insurance policies issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2026
2022.
(6) This section does not:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (5), apply to
policies not considered to be "homeowners' policies," as that
term is commonly understood in the insurance industry.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb815-00